Hawaii statutes.
[§148-63]
Rules. Subject to chapter 91, the department of agriculture shall adopt
rules, as necessary, with respect to:

(1) Definition of
terms;

(2) The design of
the seals of quality for identifying fresh or processed agricultural
commodities that are produced within the State;

(3) The
categories of fresh or processed agricultural commodities that are eligible to
use the seals of quality;

(4) The minimum
quality of fresh or processed agricultural commodities that are eligible to use
the seals of quality;

(5) The minimum per cent of wholesale value added
within the State to qualify for use of the seals of quality;

(6) Minimum
packaging and labeling requirements for fresh or processed agricultural
commodities using a seal of quality;

(7) Application
forms for the license to use the seals of quality and the information required
to be included on the application forms;

(8) Assessment
and collection of license fees for the use of the seals of quality to cover the
costs of providing the service;

(9) Assessment
and collection of charges for stickers, placards, and other promotional
materials provided by the department of agriculture;

(10) Provisions
for the appropriate use of seals of quality, including use in advertisements;

(11) Record
keeping requirements for parties licensed to use the seals of quality;

(12) Administrative
penalties for violation of this part; and

(13) Enforcement
of this part. [L 2002, c 163, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next